Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5095YH (6) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2219 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 600.8A Postadoption interviews. 1 1. The department shall conduct an interview with the 2 parent named in a final adoption decree and the adopted person 3 at least eighteen months but no later than thirty-six months 4 from the date of the final adoption decree issued by the court 5 establishing the parent-child relationship between the parent 6 named in the final adoption decree and the adopted person. 7 2. An interview conducted under this section must, at a 8 minimum, consist of all of the following: 9 a. A face-to-face interview with the parent named in the 10 final adoption decree. 11 b. A face-to-face interview with the adopted person 12 conducted outside the presence of the parent named in the final 13 adoption decree. 14 c. An assessment of the adopted personâs living conditions 15 to determine the adequacy of the living conditions. 16 d. Any other interviews the department determines relevant 17 to assess the adopted personâs well-being. 18 3. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 19 to implement this section. 20 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to adoptions 21 in which a final adoption decree is issued on or after the 22 effective date of this Act. 23